en: Puff pastry king cakes, King cakes, King cake, Twelfth Night cake
de: Dreikönigskuchen
es: Tarta de reyes, tarta de reyes francesa, torta rellena de frangipane
fr: Galettes des rois, Galette des rois, Galette des rois feuilletée, Galettes à la frangipane, Galette à la frangipane, Galettes des rois à la frangipane
hr: Kraljevski kolači
it: Torte dei Re magi
ja: キングケーキ
nl: Koningentaarten, Koningentaart

en: Classic almond puff pastry king cakes, Twelfth Night cake with almond paste, Twelfth Night cake puff pastry filled with almond paste
fr: Galettes des rois classiques à l'amande, Galette des rois feuilletée fourrée à la frangipane, Pithiviers

en: Basques cakes
fr: Gâteaux basques

en: Basque cakes with custard, Basque cake with custard, Basque shortbread with custard
fr: Gâteaux basques à la crème pâtissière, Gâteau basque à la crème pâtissière

en: Basque cakes with a cherry filling, Basque cake with cherries
fr: Gâteaux basques à la cerise, Gâteau basque aux cerises

en: Breton cakes
de: Bretonischer Kuche, Gâteau Breton
fr: Gâteaux bretons, gâteau breton
hr: Bretonski kolači
lt: Breton pyragai
nl: Bretons cakes

en: Kouign-amann, Buttered and caramelized milk bread cake
xx: Kouign-amann
de: Kouign-amann
es: Kouign-amann
fr: Kouign-amann, Kouign amann, Kouign aman
hr: Kouign-amann
it: Kouign-amann
nl: Kouign-amann

en: Canelés, cannelés, Canelé cake
fr: Canelés, cannelés, canelés de Bordeaux, cannelés de Bordeaux, Canelé, cannelé
hr: Canelés
ja: カヌレ
nl: Canelé

en: Cream puff, Pastry cream puff
bg: Профитероли
de: Windbeutel, Profiterole, Profiteroles
es: Bocadito de nata, Profiterol, Profiteroles
fr: Profiteroles, Profiterole, Profiterolles, Choux à la crème, Chou à la crème
hr: Krema od lisnatog
it: Profiterole, Profiteroles
ja: シュークリーム
nl: Soesjes, Profiterole, Slagroomsoesjes

en: Chou pastry filled with whipped cream
fr: Choux à la crème chantilly, Chou à la crème chantilly

en: Chou pastry filled with custard
fr: Chou à la crème pâtissière

en: Profiteroles with vanilla ice cream and chocolate sauce, Chou pastry with vanilla ice cream and chocolate sauce
fr: Profiterole avec glace vanille et sauce chocolat

en: Profiteroles with custard and chocolate sauce refrigerated, Chou pastry with custard and chocolate sauce refrigerated
fr: Profiteroles avec crème pâtissière et sauce chocolat

en: Coconut macaroons, Coconut macaroon, Rock-shaped coconut cake
de: Kokosmakronen
es: Macarons de coco
fi: Kookosmakronit, Kookosmacaronit
fr: Rochers à la noix de coco, Congolais, Rochers coco, rocher à la noix de coco, rocher coco, Petit gâteau à la noix de coco, Macarons à la noix de coco
hr: Kokos makaroni
it: Macarons al cocco
ja: ココナッツマカロン
nl: Kokosmacarons, Kokosmacaron

en: Paris-Brest, Chou pastry with praline flavoured creme
fr: Paris-Brest

en: Eclairs
de: Eclairs
fr: Éclairs
hr: Ekleri
ja: エクレア
nl: Eclairs
tr: Ekler

en: Chocolate eclairs
de: Schokoladen-Eclairs
es: Eclairs de chocolate
fi: suklaaeclair
fr: Éclairs au chocolat
hr: Čokoladni ekleri
it: Eclair al cioccolato
ja: チョコレートエクレア
nl: Chocolade-eclairs

en: Coffee eclairs
de: Kaffee-Eclairs
es: Eclairs de café
fr: Éclairs au café
hr: Ekleri za kavu
it: Eclair al caffè
ja: コーヒーエクレア
nl: Koffie-eclairs

en: Flan tarts, Flan tart with eggs
xx: Flans pâtissiers
fr: Flans pâtissiers, flan pâtissier, Flan pâtissier aux oeufs, Flan à la parisienne

en: Meringues, meringue
de: Baisers
fi: marengit
fr: Meringues, meringue
hr: Meringe
it: Meringhe
ja: メレンゲ
nl: Schuimpjes, Meringues